Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2373.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1101(b) and (h) and 1101.2 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 1101. Imposition of Tax.--* * *(b) Electric Light, Waterpower and Hydro-electric Utilities.--[Every](1) Except as provided under clause (2), every electric light company, waterpower company and hydro-electric company now 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 or hereafter incorporated or organized by or under any law of this Commonwealth, or now or hereafter organized or incorporated by any other state or by the United States or any foreign government and doing business in this Commonwealth, and every limited partnership, association, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, engaged in electric light and power business, waterpower business and hydro-electric business in this Commonwealth, shall pay to the State Treasurer, through the Department of Revenue, a tax of forty-four mills upon each dollar of the gross receipts of the corporation, company or association, limited partnership, joint-stock association, copartnership, person or persons, received from:[(1)] (i) the sales of electric energy within this State, except gross receipts derived from the sales for resale of electric energy to persons, partnerships, associations, corporations or political subdivisions subject to the tax imposed by this subsection upon gross receipts derived from such resale; and[(2)] (ii) the sales of electric energy produced in Pennsylvania and made outside of Pennsylvania in a state that has taken action since December 21, 1977 which results in higher costs for electric energy produced in that state and sold in Pennsylvania unless the action that was taken after December 21, 1977 is rescinded according to the following apportionment formula: except for gross receipts derived from sales under [clause (1)] subclause (i), the gross receipts from all sales of electricity of the producer shall be apportioned to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania by the ratio of the producer's operating and maintenance expenses in Pennsylvania and depreciation attributable to property in Pennsylvania to the 20260HB2373PN3162 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 producer's total operating and maintenance expenses and depreciation.(2) Beginning with the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this clause and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this clause, the rate of tax under clause (1) and section 1101.2 shall be zero mills.* * *(h) Benefits to Consumer.--(1) For purposes of this article, the reduction in the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing services from said utilities. Said benefit shall be provided in the form of a reduction in the State tax surcharge. Failure to pass through the reduction to the consumer shall subject the public utility to a civil penalty of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and such additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.(2) For purposes of this article, the entire benefit of the tax holiday under subsection (b)(2) and section 1101.2(b) shall derive to the benefit of the consumer purchasing services from said utilities. Said benefit shall be provided in the form of the elimination of the State tax surcharge, which shall be clearly reflected in each consumer's bill. Failure to pass through the entire benefit of the tax holiday to the consumer shall subject the public utility to a civil penalty of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and such additional relief as the court may deem appropriate.* * *20260HB2373PN3162 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1101.2. Establishment of Revenue-Neutral Reconciliation.--[Notwithstanding] (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), notwithstanding the provisions of 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(1) (relating to revenue-neutral reconciliation), the rate of tax established under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(2) for the period beginning January 1, 2002, shall continue in force without further adjustment for periods beginning January 1, 2003, and thereafter, and the Secretary of Revenue shall not deliver any further reports under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(3).(b) Holiday.--Beginning with the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this subsection and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this subsection, the rate of tax established under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2810(c)(2) shall be zero mills.Section 2. For the purposes of implementing the tax holiday under sections 1101(b)(2) and 1101.2(b) of the act, an electric light company, waterpower company and hydro-electric company shall separately report its monthly gross receipts subject to tax under sections 1101(b) and 1101.2(b) of the act to the Department of Revenue and shall not be taxed upon gross receipts received during said months if the requirements of section 1101(h)(2) of the act are satisfied.Section 3. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the transfer of money from the tax under Article XI of the act under section 6 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, No.178), known as the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act, shall be no less than the amount transferred under section 6 of the Alternative Fuels Incentive Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2373PN3162 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930